District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.08

Duty of Mayor to demolish or enclose deteriorated structure.

(a)

If a petition for review is not filed under § 42-3173.09 within the time period specified in § 42-3173.09, the Mayor shall demolish or enclose the deteriorated structure within 120 days after the notice of final determination has been mailed or filed, whichever is earlier.

(b)

If a petition for review is filed under § 42-3173.09 within the time period specified in § 42-3173.09, the Mayor shall demolish or enclose the deteriorated structure within 120 days after the court issues an order authorizing the Mayor to act, enters final judgment against the petitioner, or dismisses the petition.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 448
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468

History